Maine, session 132, LD1220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §456 is enacted to read:
§456. Animal chiropractic care
1. Equid defined. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
indicates, "equid" means an animal from the family Equidae, including, but not limited to,
a horse, donkey, mule or zebra.
2. Certification to perform animal chiropractic care. The board shall certify a
person licensed under this chapter to perform animal chiropractic care if the licensee has
successfully completed a 210-hour course of instruction in animal chiropractic care
approved by the board.
After receiving an initial certification from the board, the licensee must successfully
complete at least 20 hours of continuing education prior to each renewal of the licensee's
license that is specific to the diagnosis and treatment of animals, including a 2-hour course
on contagious, infectious and zoonotic diseases in this State and other locations that might
affect a licensee's animal patients.
3. Authorization to perform animal chiropractic care. A person licensed under this
chapter who is certified by the board pursuant to subsection 2 may perform animal
chiropractic care on a conscious dog or equid in accordance with the requirements of this
subsection.
A. After a referral from a licensed veterinarian, a licensee may perform animal
chiropractic care on a dog or equid. The licensee shall submit an initiation of treatment
report to the primary veterinarian of the dog or equid within 7 days of providing animal
chiropractic care to that dog or equid.
B. If a licensee suspects that the dog or equid has a contagious disease required to be
reported under state law, the licensee shall notify the primary veterinarian and the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, division of animal and plant
health.
C. A licensee may perform animal chiropractic care on a dog or equid without a referral
from a licensed veterinarian only upon completion of additional course work approved
by the State Board of Veterinary Medicine of at least 8 hours of instruction in
contagious, infectious and zoonotic diseases and at least one hour of instruction in
animal chiropractic care jurisprudence.
4. Malpractice insurance. A person licensed under this chapter who is certified by
the board to perform animal chiropractic care shall at all times maintain malpractice
insurance specific to animal chiropractic care.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §4860, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Licensed chiropractor certified to perform animal chiropractic care. A
chiropractor licensed under chapter 9 performing animal chiropractic care in accordance
with the requirements of section 456.
Page 1 - 132LR2375(01)